Georgia, session 2025_26, HB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the Georgia Student Finance Authority, is amended by adding a new subpart to
read as follows:
H. B. 130
- 1 -

LC 28 0651
"Subpart 13
20-3-494.1.
This subpart shall be known and may be cited as the 'Pay As You Earn Education Program
Act.'
20-3-494.2.
As used in this subpart, the term:
(1) 'Beginning date of a postsecondary course of study' means the first day of
postsecondary classes attended by a student for credit toward an associate's degree or
baccalaureate degree. In the case of a program that includes undergraduate studies and
is designed for completion within five years, the first day of such classes for credit in
such a program shall be the beginning date of a postsecondary course of study, whether
the program leads to a baccalaureate degree or a first professional degree. Advanced
placement classes or classes attended under a program of joint or dual enrollment in a
high school and a postsecondary institution shall not establish the beginning date of a
postsecondary course of study.
(2) 'Cost of attendance' of a student means the cost of tuition and all applicable fees.
(3) 'Eligible high school' has the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 20-3-519.
(4) 'Eligible postsecondary institution' means:
(A) An institution of the University System of Georgia that offers associate's degrees,
baccalaureate degrees, or first professional degree programs; or
(B) An institution of higher education located in this state that offers associate's
degrees, baccalaureate degrees, or first professional degree programs; that is accredited
by a regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education; that is not a Bible school or college; that admits as regular students only
persons who have a high school diploma, a high school equivalency (HSE) diploma, or
H. B. 130
- 2 -

LC 28 0651
a degree from an accredited postsecondary institution; and whose students are eligible
to participate in the federal Pell Grant program.
(5) 'First professional degree' means a degree that qualifies a graduate to practice a
profession and was earned through a first professional degree program.
(6) 'First professional degree program' means a professional degree program that meets
the requirements established by the program regulations promulgated by the Georgia
Student Finance Commission which, at a minimum, shall include, but not be limited to,
the following:
(A) Accepts students after completion of their sophomore or junior year; and
(B) Results in the award of a first professional degree.
(7) 'Pay As You Earn Education Program' or 'PAYE Education Program' or 'program'
means the student loan program established in this subpart.
(8) 'PAYE loan' means a student loan provided in accordance with the provisions of this
subpart.
20-3-494.3.
(a) The authority is authorized to provide a program of direct loans to students who are
legal residents of this state and who are not ineligible under Code Section 20-3-494.7 in
accordance with the provisions of this subpart and regulations of the authority promulgated
to implement this subpart.
(b) All public eligible postsecondary institutions shall participate in the Pay As You Earn
Education Program and any private eligible postsecondary institutions that elect to do so
may participate in the Pay As You Earn Education Program. Private eligible postsecondary
institutions shall notify the authority of their desire to participate in the program in a
manner determined by the authority.
(c) A student who desires to participate in the PAYE Education Program shall apply to the
authority in a manner determined by the authority and shall demonstrate that such student:
H. B. 130
- 3 -

LC 28 0651
(1) Is a graduate of an eligible high school;
(2) Has been accepted to a public eligible postsecondary institution or a participating
private eligible postsecondary institution;
(3) In the case of a graduate student, has received a baccalaureate degree from an
accredited college or university; and
(4) Has not previously participated in the PAYE Education Program at any other eligible
postsecondary institution.
(d) Participation in the program shall include at least 1 percent of the incoming freshman
class each year at the participating eligible postsecondary institution. The participating
eligible postsecondary institution shall determine the number of students in excess of
1 percent that shall be allowed to participate in the program.
(e) A student accepted into the program shall agree in writing to the provisions of the
program, including the repayment provisions of this subpart.
20-3-494.4.
(a) A student who is accepted to participate in the Pay As You Earn Education Program
shall be required to pay $1,000.00 each year toward the student's cost of attendance. The
participating eligible postsecondary institution shall provide the remaining funds in the
form of a payment plan based upon the future earnings of the student for a period of 15
years after the student's graduation. The institution at which the student is enrolled shall
forward to the authority annually a report for each student enrolled at such institution who
is participating in the PAYE Education Program which shall contain the actual cost of
attendance for such student and any credits toward such cost of attendance applied by the
institution, including the student's payment of $1,000.00 as provided in this subsection.
Tuition equalization grant funds for the student and HOPE scholarship funds and all other
scholarship funds received by the student and paid to the participating eligible
H. B. 130
- 4 -

LC 28 0651
postsecondary institution shall be credited to the student's cost of attendance. The
remaining sum shall be the amount of the PAYE loan to the student for each year.
(b) A student participating in the PAYE Education Program shall not be eligible for
remedial courses at the eligible postsecondary institution. Any required remedial courses
shall be completed before the student shall be eligible for participating in the PAYE
Education Program.
(c) An undergraduate student participating in the program shall be required to obtain a
baccalaureate degree within four years of the beginning date of a postsecondary course of
study or such student's first professional degree within five years of the beginning date of
a postsecondary course of study.
20-3-494.5.
100 (a) In the case of an undergraduate student, upon receiving a baccalaureate degree or first
101 professional degree, and in the case of a graduate student, upon receiving such graduate
102 degree, a student participating in the PAYE Education Program shall begin paying 3
103 percent of his or her federal annual adjusted gross income as shown by annual federal
104 income tax returns to the eligible postsecondary institution from which the student received
105 the degree under the PAYE Education Program. The authority shall by rule and regulation
106 promulgate procedures for the payment of these funds.
107 (b) Such payments shall continue for a period of 15 years following the receipt by the
108 student of his or her degree as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section; provided,
109 however, that a student may alternatively elect to repay the actual total amount of funds
110 loaned to the student under the program which shall be the cost of attendance less any other
111 scholarships or grants credited to the student's cost of attendance plus 3 percent simple
112 interest on such funds. If the student elects the alternative payment method, such payment
113 shall be completed in not more than ten years following, in the case of an undergraduate
H. B. 130
- 5 -

LC 28 0651
114 student, the receiving of such baccalaureate degree or first professional degree, and in the
115 case of a graduate student, the receiving of a graduate degree.
116 (c) Prior to receiving a baccalaureate or first professional degree, if an undergraduate
117 student ceases to be a student for three consecutive semesters or four consecutive quarters
118 at the eligible postsecondary institution at which the student participated in the PAYE
119 Education Program or, prior to receiving the graduate degree sought when enrolling in the
120 program, a graduate student ceases to be a student for three consecutive semesters or four
121 consecutive quarters at the eligible postsecondary institution at which the student
122 participated in the PAYE Education Program, the PAYE loan shall become immediately
123 due and repayment shall begin as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.
124 20-3-494.6.
125 (a) A private eligible postsecondary institution that participates in the PAYE Education
126 Program as provided in this subpart shall be allowed a tax credit of $1,000.00 for each
127 student enrolled in the institution who is participating in the PAYE Education Program
128 each year. Such tax credit may be applied by the institution toward the institution's tax
129 liabilities for state income taxes, sales taxes, and property taxes for the year in which such
130 credit is allowed.
131 (b) The funds paid by a student in repaying the PAYE loan under this subpart shall be a
132 permitted deduction from such student's federal adjusted gross income as defined in the
133 United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in computing such student's Georgia taxable
134 net income.
135 20-3-494.7.
136 A student shall not be eligible for any PAYE loan described in this subpart if the student:
137 (1) Is not a United States citizen or a permanent resident alien who meets the definition
138 of an eligible noncitizen under federal Title IV requirements;
H. B. 130
- 6 -

LC 28 0651
139 (2) Has not complied with United States Selective Service System requirements for
140 registration, if such requirements are applicable to the student;
141 (3) Is in default on a federal Title IV educational loan or a State of Georgia educational
142 loan, provided that a student who is otherwise eligible and has fully repaid the defaulted
143 loan will be eligible to obtain a PAYE loan for future academic terms but not
144 retroactively;
145 (4) Owes a refund on a federal Title IV student financial aid program or a Georgia
146 student financial aid program, provided that a student who is otherwise eligible and has
147 fully paid the refund owed shall be eligible to obtain a PAYE loan for future academic
148 terms but not retroactively;
149 (5) Has been convicted of a felony offense involving marijuana, a controlled substance,
150 or a dangerous drug as set out in Code Section 20-1-23 or 20-1-24, provided that such
151 ineligibility extends from the date of conviction to the completion of the next academic
152 term;
153 (6) Is incarcerated; or
154 (7) Does not meet each qualification listed in this subpart and applicable to the student."
155 SECTION 2.
156 Code Section 48-7-27 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to computation
157 of taxable net income, is amended in subsection (a) by striking "and" at the end of paragraph
158 (14), by replacing the period with "; and" at the end of paragraph (15), and by adding a new
159 paragraph to read as follows:
160 "(16) The deduction provided for in Code Section 20-3-494.6."
161 SECTION 3.
162 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 130
- 7 -